North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 40A. North Carolina Courts Commission.

§ 7A-506.
Creation; members; terms; qualifications; vacancies.

The North Carolina Courts Commission is created. Effective July 1, 1993, it shall consist of 28 members, seven to be appointed by the Governor, seven to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, seven to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and seven to be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.

Of the appointees of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, one shall be a Justice of the Supreme Court, one shall be a Judge of the Court of Appeals, two shall be judges of superior court, two shall be district court judges, and one shall be a public member who is not an attorney and who is not an officer or employee of the Judicial Department.

Of the seven appointees of the Governor, one shall be a district attorney, one shall be a practicing attorney, one shall be a clerk of superior court, at least three shall be members of the General Assembly, at least two shall not be attorneys, and of the nonattorneys, one shall be a public member who is not an officer or employee of the Judicial Department.

Of the seven appointees of the Speaker of the House, at least three shall be practicing attorneys, at least three shall be members of the General Assembly, at least two shall not be attorneys, and of the non-attorneys, one shall be a public member who is not an officer or employee of the Judicial Department.

Of the seven appointees of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least three shall be practicing attorneys, at least three shall be members of the General Assembly, at least one shall be a magistrate, and one shall be a public member who is not an attorney and who is not an officer or employee of the Judicial Department.

Of the initial appointments of each appointing authority, three shall be appointed for four-year terms to begin July 1, 1993, and three shall be appointed for two-year terms to begin July 1, 1993. The two public members appointed by the Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be appointed for four-year terms to begin July 1, 1997. The two public members appointed by the Chief Justice and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall be appointed for two-year terms to begin July 1, 1997. Successors shall be appointed for four-year terms.

A vacancy in membership shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by the appointing authority who made the original appointment. A member whose term expires may be reappointed.

History.

1979, c. 1077, s. 1; 1981, c. 847; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1253, s. 4; 1983, c. 181, ss. 1, 2; c. 774, s. 2; 1991, c. 739, s. 7; 1993, c. 438, s. 1; 1997-82, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

§ 7A-507.
Ex officio members.

The following additional members shall serve ex officio: the Administrative Officer of the Courts; a representative of the N. C. State Bar appointed by the Council thereof; and a representative of the N. C. Bar Association appointed by the Board of Governors thereof. The Administrative Officer of the Courts has no vote.

History.

1979, c. 1077, s. 1; 1997-82, s. 2.

§ 7A-508.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the Commission to make continuing studies of the structure, organization, jurisdiction, procedures and personnel of the Judicial Department and of the General Court of Justice and to make recommendations to the General Assembly for such changes therein as will facilitate the administration of justice.

History.

1979, c. 1077, s. 1.

§ 7A-509.
Chair; meetings; compensation of members.

The Governor, after consultation with the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, shall appoint a chair from the legislative members of the Commission. The term of the chair is two years, and the chair may be reappointed. The Commission shall meet at such times and places as the chair shall designate. The facilities of the State Legislative Building shall be available to the Commission, subject to approval of the Legislative Services Commission. The members of the Commission shall receive the same per diem and reimbursement for travel expenses as members of State boards and commissions generally.

History.

1979, c. 1077, s. 1; 1993, c. 438, s. 2.

§ 7A-510.
Supporting services.

The Commission is authorized to contract for such professional and clerical services as are necessary in the proper performance of its duties.

History.

1979, c. 1077, s. 1.

§§ 7A-511 through 7A-515.

Reserved for future codification purposes.